Maryland, session 2026, HB0879.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0879*

HOUSE BILL 879
SUBTITLE 8. LANGUAGE ACQUISITION TRACKING PROGRAM FOR DEAF AND HARD
OF HEARING CHILDREN.
8–801.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ADVISORY COUNCIL” MEANS THE LANGUAGE ACQUISITION FOR DEAF
AND HARD OF HEARING CHILDREN ADVISORY COUNCIL.
(C) “DEAF OR HARD OF HEARING” MEANS A DIAGNOSIS OF PERMANENT
HEARING LOSS IN ONE OR BOTH EARS.
(D) “ELIGIBLE CHILD” MEANS A DEAF OR HARD OF HEARING CHILD WHO:
(1) IS UNDER THE AGE OF 9 YEARS; AND
(2) HAS:
(I) AN INDIVIDUALIZED FAMILY SERVICE PLAN THROUGH THE
MARYLAND INFANTS AND TODDLERS PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER § 8–416 OF
THIS TITLE;
(II) AN INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM UNDER § 8–405
OF THIS TITLE; OR
(III) A SECTION 504 PLAN IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FEDERAL
REHABILITATION ACT OF 1973.
(E) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE LANGUAGE ACQUISITION TRACKING
PROGRAM FOR DEAF AND HARD OF HEARING CHILDREN.
(F) “STATE COORDINATOR” MEANS THE STATE COORDINATOR OF
LANGUAGE ACQUISITION FOR DEAF AND HARD OF HEARING CHILDREN.
8–802.
(A) THERE IS A LANGUAGE ACQUISITION TRACKING PROGRAM FOR DEAF
AND HARD OF HEARING CHILDREN IN THE DEPARTMENT.

HOUSE BILL 879 3
(B) (1) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO ENSURE THAT ELIGIBLE
CHILDREN DEVELOP LANGUAGE SKILLS AT THE SAME RATE AND TO THE SAME
EXTENT AS THEIR PEERS.
(2) THE PROGRAM SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE TO ALL ELIGIBLE
CHILDREN AT NO COST.
(3) AN ELIGIBLE CHILD SHALL BE ASSESSED FOR LANGUAGE
ACQUISITION SKILLS FROM ENTRY INTO THE PROGRAM UNTIL THE CHILD’S NINTH
BIRTHDAY.
(C) (1) THE PROGRAM SHALL TRACK EACH ELIGIBLE CHILD’S LANGUAGE
ACQUISITION USING THE LANGUAGE ASSESSMENT TOOL APPROVED BY THE
ADVISORY COUNCIL.
(2) (I) THE LANGUAGE ASSESSMENT TOOL SHALL BE USED TO
ASSESS THE SIGNED LANGUAGE ACQUISITION OR THE SPOKEN LANGUAGE
ACQUISITION OF EACH ELIGIBLE CHILD IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBPARAGRAPH (II)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(II) AN ELIGIBLE CHILD’S PARENT OR GUARDIAN SHALL USE A
PROCESS ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO SELECT WHETHER THE LANGUAGE
ASSESSMENT TOOL ASSESSES THE ELIGIBLE CHILD’S SIGNED LANGUAGE
ACQUISITION, SPOKEN LANGUAGE ACQUISITION, OR BOTH.
(3) THE LANGUAGE ASSESSMENT TOOL SHALL BE ADMINISTERED TO
EACH ELIGIBLE CHILD:
(I) BY THE ELIGIBLE CHILD’S TEACHER OR AN ASSESSMENT
SPECIALIST; AND
(II) 1. WITHIN 6 MONTHS AFTER THE ELIGIBLE CHILD IS
DIAGNOSED AS BEING DEAF OR HARD OF HEARING; AND
2. EVERY 6 MONTHS THEREAFTER.
(4) AN ASSESSMENT WITH THE LANGUAGE ASSESSMENT TOOL SHALL
EVALUATE AN ELIGIBLE CHILD’S PROGRESS TOWARD MEETING AGE– AND
GRADE–APPROPRIATE DEVELOPMENTAL MILESTONES AND LANGUAGE
ACQUISITION BENCHMARKS IDENTIFIED BY THE STATE COORDINATOR.
(5) EDUCATORS AND ASSESSMENT SPECIALISTS SHALL USE THE
LANGUAGE ASSESSMENT TOOL TO TRACK AN ELIGIBLE CHILD’S PROGRESS

HOUSE BILL 879
THROUGH DEVELOPMENTAL STAGES TOWARD KINDERGARTEN READINESS AND
ENGLISH LITERACY.
(6) ANY INFORMATION COLLECTED USING THE LANGUAGE
ASSESSMENT TOOL MAY:
(I) BE PROVIDED TO THE ELIGIBLE CHILD’S TEACHER AND
PARENT OR GUARDIAN; AND
(II) BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ELIGIBLE CHILD’S
INDIVIDUALIZED FAMILY SERVICE PLAN, INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM,
OR SECTION 504 PLAN, AS APPLICABLE.
(7) IF AN ELIGIBLE CHILD DOES NOT DEMONSTRATE PROGRESS IN
EXPRESSIVE LANGUAGE ACQUISITION AND RECEPTIVE LANGUAGE ACQUISITION AS
MEASURED BY THE LANGUAGE ASSESSMENT TOOL, THE ELIGIBLE CHILD’S
INDIVIDUALIZED FAMILY SERVICE PLAN, INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM,
OR SECTION 504 PLAN, AS APPLICABLE, SHALL BE UPDATED TO:
(I) EXPLAIN IN DETAIL THE REASONS WHY THE ELIGIBLE
CHILD IS NOT MAKING PROGRESS TOWARD AGE– AND GRADE–APPROPRIATE
DEVELOPMENTAL MILESTONES AND LANGUAGE ACQUISITION BENCHMARKS; AND
(II) SPECIFY SPECIFIC STRATEGIES, SERVICES, AND PROGRAMS
THAT WILL BE PROVIDED TO ASSIST THE CHILD.
(8) THE STATE COORDINATOR SHALL PROVIDE PROFESSIONAL
DEVELOPMENT AND TRAINING OPPORTUNITIES FOR EDUCATORS AND ASSESSMENT
SPECIALISTS ON THE USE AND OPERATION OF THE LANGUAGE ASSESSMENT TOOL.
(D) A PARENT OR GUARDIAN MAY OPT AN ELIGIBLE CHILD OUT OF AN
ASSESSMENT UNDER THE PROGRAM BY PROVIDING WRITTEN NOTIFICATION TO THE
CHILD’S SCHOOL THAT THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN HAS OPTED THE CHILD OUT OF
AN ASSESSMENT.
8–803.
(A) THERE IS A STATE COORDINATOR OF LANGUAGE ACQUISITION FOR
DEAF AND HARD OF HEARING CHILDREN.
(B) THE STATE COORDINATOR IS A POSITION WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT.
(C) (1) THE STATE COORDINATOR MUST:

HOUSE BILL 879 5
(I) HOLD AN ADVANCED DEGREE OR A PROFESSIONAL LICENSE
IN EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATION, THE EDUCATION OF DEAF CHILDREN, OR A
RELATED FIELD;
(II) DEMONSTRATE PROFICIENCY IN AMERICAN SIGN
LANGUAGE AND WRITTEN ENGLISH;
(III) DEMONSTRATE A PROFESSIONAL KNOWLEDGE OF
DIFFERENT LANGUAGE MODALITIES INCLUDING SIGNED LANGUAGE, PROTACTILE
LANGUAGE, AND SPOKEN LANGUAGE; AND
(IV) DEMONSTRATE A PROFESSIONAL KNOWLEDGE OF HEARING
TECHNOLOGIES FOR USE BY DEAF OR HARD OF HEARING CHILDREN.
(2) IF PRACTICABLE, THE STATE COORDINATOR MUST BE A DEAF OR
HARD OF HEARING INDIVIDUAL.
(D) THE STATE COORDINATOR IS RESPONSIBLE FOR THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF THE PROGRAM.
(E) THE STATE COORDINATOR’S DUTIES INCLUDE:
(1) IDENTIFYING, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE ADVISORY COUNCIL
AND OTHER STATES THAT HAVE DEVELOPED SIMILAR MILESTONES AND
BENCHMARKS, AGE– AND GRADE–APPROPRIATE DEVELOPMENTAL MILESTONES
AND LANGUAGE ACQUISITION BENCHMARKS TO BE USED BY THE PROGRAM TO
EVALUATE THE PROGRESS OF ELIGIBLE CHILDREN IN BOTH EXPRESSIVE LANGUAGE
SKILLS AND RECEPTIVE LANGUAGE SKILLS;
(2) DEVELOPING AND IMPLEMENTING A PROCESS FOR ASSESSING
THE MILESTONES AND BENCHMARKS IDENTIFIED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION;
(3) OVERSEEING THE COLLECTION, TRACKING, AND REPORTING OF
ASSESSMENT DATA UNDER THE PROGRAM;
(4) ENSURING THAT ELIGIBLE CHILDREN ARE BEING PROPERLY
TRACKED BY THE LANGUAGE ASSESSMENT TOOL APPROVED BY THE ADVISORY
COUNCIL UNDER § 8–805 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(5) CREATING A PARENT AND GUARDIAN RESOURCE THAT MEETS THE
CRITERIA LISTED UNDER § 8–804 OF THIS SUBTITLE;

HOUSE BILL 879
(6) AIDING THE DEPARTMENT IN PUBLISHING THE ANNUAL REPORT
REQUIRED UNDER § 8–807 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(7) ENSURING THAT ALL ELIGIBLE STUDENTS ARE EVALUATED WITH
THE LANGUAGE ASSESSMENT TOOL TO TRACK LANGUAGE ACQUISITION PROGRESS
REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE ELIGIBLE STUDENTS HAVE BEEN CATEGORIZED
PRIMARILY AS DEAF OR HARD OF HEARING; AND
(8) CONSULTING WITH THE ADVISORY COUNCIL ON THE EXECUTION
OF THE PROGRAM.
(F) IN THE PERFORMANCE OF ASSIGNED DUTIES, THE STATE
COORDINATOR SHALL WORK IN COLLABORATION AND COOPERATION WITH:
(1) THE EARLY HEARING DETECTION AND INTERVENTION
PROGRAM ESTABLISHED BY THE SECRETARY OF HEALTH UNDER TITLE 13,
SUBTITLE 6 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE;
(2) THE MARYLAND INFANTS AND TODDLERS PROGRAM
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 8–416 OF THIS TITLE;
(3) COUNTY BOARDS; AND
(4) THE MARYLAND SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF.
8–804.
(A) THE STATE COORDINATOR SHALL CREATE A PARENT AND GUARDIAN
RESOURCE.
(B) (1) THE PURPOSE OF THE PARENT AND GUARDIAN RESOURCE IS TO
PROVIDE PARENTS AND GUARDIANS WITH INFORMATION ABOUT AGE– AND
GRADE–APPROPRIATE DEVELOPMENTAL MILESTONES AND LANGUAGE
ACQUISITION BENCHMARKS FOR CHILDREN AT DIFFERENT AGES UNDER THE AGE
OF 9 YEARS.
(2) THE PARENT AND GUARDIAN RESOURCE SHALL:
(I) INCLUDE RESEARCH– AND EVIDENCE–BASED,
COMPREHENSIVE INFORMATION ABOUT THE PROGRAM’S:

HOUSE BILL 879 7
1. AGE– AND GRADE–APPROPRIATE DEVELOPMENTAL
MILESTONES; AND
2. LANGUAGE ACQUISITION BENCHMARKS, INCLUDING
SIGNED LANGUAGE ACQUISITION AND SPOKEN LANGUAGE ACQUISITION;
(II) HELP A PARENT OR GUARDIAN TRACK AN ELIGIBLE CHILD’S
PROGRESS TOWARD THE PROGRAM’S:
1. AGE– AND GRADE–APPROPRIATE DEVELOPMENTAL
MILESTONES; AND
2. LANGUAGE ACQUISITION BENCHMARKS, INCLUDING
SIGNED LANGUAGE ACQUISITION, SPOKEN LANGUAGE ACQUISITION, EXPRESSIVE
LANGUAGE ACQUISITION, AND RECEPTIVE LANGUAGE ACQUISITION;
(III) INCLUDE INFORMATION ABOUT AVAILABLE SERVICES AND
PROGRAMS FOR WHICH AN ELIGIBLE CHILD MAY QUALIFY;
(IV) BE WRITTEN CLEARLY AND BE EASY TO UNDERSTAND;
(V) BE APPROPRIATE FOR USE WITH DEAF OR HARD OF
HEARING CHILDREN;
(VI) BE CONSISTENT WITH EXISTING STATE AND FEDERAL
GUIDELINES GOVERNING CHILDREN WITH DISABILITIES AND LANGUAGE
ACQUISITION; AND
(VII) INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING STATEMENTS:
1. “THIS PARENT AND GUARDIAN RESOURCE IS NOT A
FORMAL ASSESSMENT OF A CHILD’S LANGUAGE AND LITERACY DEVELOPMENT.”;
2. “A PARENT’S OR GUARDIAN’S OBSERVATIONS OF A
CHILD MAY DIFFER FROM THE WAY THE CHILD IS DESCRIBED THROUGH FORMAL
ASSESSMENT PRESENTED AS PART OF A CHILD’S INDIVIDUALIZED FAMILY SERVICE
PLAN, INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM, OR SECTION 504 PLAN.”; AND
3. “A PARENT OR GUARDIAN MAY BRING THIS PARENT
AND GUARDIAN RESOURCE TO A CHILD’S INDIVIDUALIZED FAMILY SERVICE PLAN
MEETING, INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM MEETING, OR SECTION 504 PLAN
MEETING IN ORDER TO SHARE OBSERVATIONS ABOUT A CHILD’S EXPRESSIVE

HOUSE BILL 879
LANGUAGE ACQUISITION AND RECEPTIVE LANGUAGE ACQUISITION AND LITERACY
DEVELOPMENT.”.
(C) THE STATE COORDINATOR SHALL:
(1) TAKE REASONABLE STEPS TO PROVIDE EQUAL ACCESS TO THE
PARENT AND GUARDIAN RESOURCE FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH LIMITED ENGLISH
PROFICIENCY WHO NEED LANGUAGE ASSISTANCE, INCLUDING ANY ORAL, WRITTEN,
AND SIGN LANGUAGE SERVICES; AND
(2) ARRANGE FOR THE TRANSLATION OF THE PARENT AND
GUARDIAN RESOURCE INTO ANY LANGUAGE SPOKEN BY ANY LIMITED ENGLISH
PROFICIENT POPULATION THAT CONSTITUTES 3% OF THE POPULATION WITHIN THE
GEOGRAPHIC AREA SERVED BY A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT, WITH THE ASSISTANCE OF THE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH, THE MARYLAND SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF, AND COUNTY
BOARDS, SHALL PROVIDE A COPY OF THE PARENT AND GUARDIAN RESOURCE TO THE
PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF EACH ELIGIBLE CHILD.
8–805.
(A) THERE IS A LANGUAGE ACQUISITION FOR DEAF AND HARD OF
HEARING CHILDREN ADVISORY COUNCIL.
(B) THE ADVISORY COUNCIL CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(1) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF THE
DEAF AND HARD OF HEARING, APPOINTED BY THE DIRECTOR OF THE OFFICE;
(2) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPARTMENT, APPOINTED BY
THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT;
(3) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH, APPOINTED BY THE SECRETARY OF HEALTH; AND
(4) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING
MEMBERS, APPOINTED BY THE STATE COORDINATOR:
(I) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE EARLY HEARING
DETECTION AND INTERVENTION ADVISORY COUNCIL;

HOUSE BILL 879 9
(II) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND SCHOOL FOR
THE DEAF;
(III) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEAF OR HARD OF HEARING
COMMUNITY WITH EXPERIENCE IN THE EDUCATION OF DEAF OR HARD OF HEARING
CHILDREN;
(IV) ONE EMPLOYEE OF A COUNTY BOARD WITH EXPERTISE IN
THE EDUCATION OF DEAF OR HARD OF HEARING CHILDREN;
(V) ONE PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF A DEAF OR HARD OF
HEARING CHILD WHO COMMUNICATES PRIMARILY THROUGH AMERICAN SIGN
LANGUAGE;
(VI) ONE PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF A DEAF OR HARD OF
HEARING CHILD WHO COMMUNICATES PRIMARILY THROUGH SPOKEN ENGLISH;
(VII) ONE DEAF OR HARD OF HEARING PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF
A DEAF OR HARD OF HEARING CHILD;
(VIII) ONE EMPLOYEE OF A COUNTY BOARD WHO WORKS IN A
LOCAL INFANTS AND TODDLERS PROGRAM ESTABLISHED OR DESIGNATED UNDER §
8–416 OF THIS TITLE THAT SERVES DEAF OR HARD OF HEARING CHILDREN;
(IX) ONE TEACHER WHO:
1. TEACHES DEAF OR HARD OF HEARING CHILDREN;
AND
2. HAS EXPERTISE IN AMERICAN SIGN LANGUAGE AND
ENGLISH LANGUAGE ASSESSMENT; AND
(X) ONE TEACHER WHO TEACHES DEAF OR HARD OF HEARING
CHILDREN USING SPOKEN ENGLISH.
(C) IN APPOINTING MEMBERS TO THE ADVISORY COUNCIL, THE STATE
COORDINATOR SHALL ATTEMPT TO ENSURE THAT AN EQUAL NUMBER OF
REPRESENTATIVES HAVE EXPERTISE IN SIGNED LANGUAGE AND SPOKEN
LANGUAGE.
(D) (1) THE TERM OF A MEMBER IS 3 YEARS.
(2) THE TERM OF A MEMBER BEGINS JULY 1.

HOUSE BILL 879
(3) THE TERMS OF MEMBERS ARE STAGGERED AS REQUIRED BY THE
TERMS PROVIDED FOR MEMBERS OF THE ADVISORY COUNCIL ON JULY 1, 2026.
(4) AT THE END OF A TERM, A MEMBER CONTINUES TO SERVE UNTIL
A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND QUALIFIES.
(5) A MEMBER WHO IS APPOINTED AFTER A TERM HAS BEGUN SERVES
ONLY FOR THE REST OF THE TERM OR UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND
QUALIFIES.
(E) THE MEMBERS OF THE ADVISORY COUNCIL SHALL ELECT A CHAIR
FROM AMONG THE ADVISORY COUNCIL’S MEMBERS.
(F) THE ADVISORY COUNCIL SHALL MEET WHEN CONVENED BY THE STATE
COORDINATOR.
(G) A MEMBER OF THE ADVISORY COUNCIL:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
ADVISORY COUNCIL; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(H) THE ADVISORY COUNCIL SHALL:
(1) EVALUATE EXISTING LANGUAGE ASSESSMENT TOOLS THAT MEET
THE CRITERIA SPECIFIED IN § 8–806 OF THIS SUBTITLE FOR USE AS PART OF THE
PROGRAM;
(2) APPROVE A LANGUAGE ASSESSMENT TOOL TO BE USED BY THE
PROGRAM TO ASSESS AND TRACK THE LANGUAGE ACQUISITION OF ELIGIBLE
CHILDREN;
(3) REVIEW THE ANNUAL REPORT REQUIRED UNDER § 8–807 OF THIS
SUBTITLE;
(4) PROVIDE CONSULTATION SERVICES TO THE STATE
COORDINATOR ON IDENTIFYING AGE– AND GRADE–APPROPRIATE DEVELOPMENTAL
MILESTONES AND LANGUAGE ACQUISITION BENCHMARKS IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
8–803 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND

HOUSE BILL 879 11
(5) PROVIDE ADVICE TO THE STATE COORDINATOR ON HOW TO
ACCOMPLISH THE AIMS OF THE PROGRAM.
(I) THE ADVISORY COUNCIL MAY MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE
STATE COORDINATOR ON CHANGES TO THE PARENT AND GUARDIAN RESOURCE.
8–806.
(A) A LANGUAGE ASSESSMENT TOOL MUST MEET THE CRITERIA DESCRIBED
UNDER THIS SECTION TO BE USED IN THE PROGRAM.
(B) THE LANGUAGE ASSESSMENT TOOL SHALL:
(1) INCLUDE THE STAGES OF AGE– AND GRADE–APPROPRIATE
LANGUAGE ACQUISITION AND DEVELOPMENT;
(2) BE APPROPRIATE FOR DEAF OR HARD OF HEARING CHILDREN;
(3) BE A TOOL USED TO ASSESS THE DEVELOPMENT OF CHILDREN
UNDER THE AGE OF 9 YEARS;
(4) BE IN A FORMAT THAT ALLOWS EDUCATORS AND ASSESSMENT
SPECIALISTS TO TRACK, THROUGH AN ELIGIBLE CHILD’S EXPRESSIVE LANGUAGE
ACQUISITION AND RECEPTIVE LANGUAGE ACQUISITION, PROGRESS TOWARD
KINDERGARTEN READINESS AND ENGLISH LITERACY; AND
(5) BE USEFUL IN ESTABLISHING OR REVISING AN ELIGIBLE CHILD’S
INDIVIDUALIZED FAMILY SERVICE PLAN, INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM,
OR SECTION 504 PLAN, OR AS PART OF AN ASSESSMENT REQUIRED BY COMPARABLE
PLANS.
8–807.
(A) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2028, AND EACH JULY 1 THEREAFTER,
THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH AND THE MARYLAND SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF, SHALL ISSUE A REPORT ON
THE LANGUAGE ACQUISITION AND LITERACY DEVELOPMENT OF ELIGIBLE
CHILDREN.
(2) THE REPORT SHALL BE:

HOUSE BILL 879
(I) ISSUED, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, TO THE SENATE COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION, ENERGY,
AND THE ENVIRONMENT AND THE HOUSE WAYS AND MEANS COMMITTEE; AND
(II) PUBLISHED ON THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE IN A MANNER
THAT IS ACCESSIBLE FROM THE HOMEPAGE OF THE WEBSITE.
(B) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL COMPARE THE
LANGUAGE ACQUISITION OF ELIGIBLE CHILDREN WITH THE LANGUAGE
ACQUISITION OF THEIR PEERS.
(C) (1) THE REPORT SHALL INCLUDE RESULTS DISAGGREGATED BY AN
ELIGIBLE CHILD’S:
(I) LANGUAGE MODALITY, WHETHER SIGNED OR SPOKEN;
(II) HEARING LEVEL;
(III) DISABILITY STATUS, OTHER THAN DEAF OR HARD OF
HEARING; AND
(IV) RACE.
(2) IF RESULTS CAN BE INCLUDED TO PRODUCE MEANINGFUL
INFORMATION CONSISTENT WITH STATE AND FEDERAL LAW GOVERNING THE
PRIVACY OF CHILD AND STUDENT INFORMATION, THE REPORT SHALL INCLUDE
RESULTS DISAGGREGATED BY:
(I) SERVICES AN ELIGIBLE CHILD HAS RECEIVED; AND
(II) AN ELIGIBLE CHILD’S GEOGRAPHIC LOCATION.
(D) ALL DATA SHALL BE REPORTED IN A MANNER CONSISTENT WITH STATE
AND FEDERAL LAW GOVERNING THE PRIVACY OF CHILD AND STUDENT
INFORMATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the terms of the initial
members of the Language Acquisition for Deaf and Hard of Hearing Children Advisory
Council shall expire as follows:
(1) four members in 2029;
(2) four members in 2030; and

HOUSE BILL 879 13
(3) five members in 2031.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.